Utah statutes.
78A-7-120.   Disposition of fines.
(1)  Except as otherwise specified by this section, fines and forfeitures
collected by a justice court shall be remitted, 1/2 to the treasurer of the
local government responsible for the court and 1/2 to the treasurer of the
local government which prosecutes or which would prosecute the violation.
(2) (a)  For violation of Title 23, the court shall allocate 85% to the
Division of Wildlife Resources and 15% to the general fund of the city or
county government responsible for the justice court.
(b)  For violation of Title 41, Chapter 22, Off-highway Vehicles, or Title 73,
Chapter 18, State Boating Act, the court shall allocate 85% to the Division of
Parks and Recreation and 15% to the general fund of the city or county
government responsible for the justice court.
(3)  The surcharge established by Section 51-9-401 shall be paid to the state
treasurer.
(4)  Fines, fees, court costs, and forfeitures collected by a municipal or
county justice court for a violation of Section 72-7-404 or 72-7-406 regarding
maximum weight limitations and overweight permits, minus court costs not to
exceed the schedule adopted by the Judicial Council, shall be paid to the
state treasurer and distributed to the class B and C road account.
(5)  Revenue deposited in the class B and C road account pursuant to
Subsection (4) is supplemental to the money appropriated under Section
72-2-107 but shall be expended in the same manner as other class B and C road
funds.
(6) (a)  Fines and forfeitures collected by the court for a second or
subsequent violation under Section 41-6a-1713 or Subsection 72-7-409(8)(b)
shall be remitted:
(i)  60% to the state treasurer to be deposited in the Transportation Fund;
and
(ii)  40% in accordance with Subsection (1).
(b)  Fines and forfeitures collected by the court for a second or subsequent
violation under Subsection 72-7-409(8)(c) shall be remitted:
(i)  50% to the state treasurer to be deposited in the Transportation Fund;
and
(ii)  50% in accordance with Subsection (1).
